District of Columbia statutes.
24-231.06

Joint venture agreements.

(a)

The Mayor is authorized to enter into an agreement with any private-sector employer to establish a joint venture for the management and operation of all or any part of a prison industry.

(b)

The terms of a joint venture agreement shall include:

(1)

Area space requirements, equipment, security services, and utilities;

(2)

Procedures for the selection of prisoners for employment; and

(3)

A commitment by the private-sector employer to indemnify, hold harmless, and defend the District, its agents, officers, and employees against any and all claims or liability of any kind arising from, based on, or resulting from any act, default, or omission of the private-sector employer under the agreement.

May 8, 1996, D.C. Law 11-117, § 7, 43 DCR 1179
1981 Ed., § 24-458.6.